Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.2701

License plate.

"License plate" means a plate that may be issued to a vehicle owner by the department or by an authorized entity for vehicle licensing or identification purposes. "License plates" do not include: (1) Temporary license plates; or (2) metal tags issued for the purposes of licensing wheeled all-terrain vehicles.

[ 2022 c 132 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 132: "This act takes effect July 1, 2023." [ 2022 c 132 s 8.]